California statutes. Water Code
(c) Agriculture, recreation, and wildlife thrive within the Yolo Bypass, exemplified by the state-owned Yolo Bypass Wildlife Area, which supports wildlife-friendly rice cultivation and livestock grazing, managed wetlands for migratory waterfowl, nature education opportunities for the region’s schools, nature viewing, and hunting.

(d) Cache Slough is located primarily within the County of Solano, intersecting with the southern portion of the Yolo Bypass. Cache Slough supports remnant tidal habitat where restoration of natural conditions could benefit delta smelt and other native aquatic species. Cache Slough is also a regionally significant agricultural area where the location of multiple-benefit projects could affect the operations and maintenance practices of agricultural
 diverters and core flood control and levee maintenance responsibilities of reclamation districts within the Cache Slough Complex.

(e) The North Bay Aqueduct portion of the State Water Project delivers source water directly from the Cache Slough Complex to over 500,000 residents in the Counties of Napa and Solano. Opportunities for multiple-benefit projects must consider impacts to municipal water supply and water quality.

(f) Together, the Yolo Bypass and Cache Slough region presents unparalleled opportunities for multiple-benefit projects that improve flood protection, fisheries and wildlife habitat, water supply and water quality, agricultural sustainability, and recreational opportunities. As such, the Yolo Bypass and Cache Slough region is the focus of an increasing number of
 federal, state, and locally developed projects intended to improve these multiple public values.

(g) The numerous interests in this complex and important region present an opportunity and an imperative for governmental agencies at the federal, state, and local levels to collaboratively align planning efforts and project implementation.

(h) In May 2016, a total of 15 federal, state, and local agencies signed a memorandum of understanding outlining principles necessary to achieve a common vision for the Yolo Bypass and Cache Slough region. The resulting Yolo Bypass Cache Slough Partnership serves as a model for public agency cooperation and achievement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   (SB 369)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8511.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Yolo Bypass Cache Slough Partnership” means the multiagency partnership established pursuant to a memorandum of understanding signed in May 2016 by all of the following public agencies:

(1) United States Bureau of Reclamation.

(2) United States Fish and Wildlife Service.

(3) National Marine Fisheries Service.

(4) United States Army Corps of Engineers.

(5) County of Yolo.

(6) County of Solano.

(7) Sacramento Area Flood Control Agency.

(8) Solano County Water Agency.

(9) Reclamation District No. 2068.

(10) Natural Resources Agency.

(11) Department of Water Resources.

(12) Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(13) Central Valley Flood Protection Board.

(14) State Water Resources Control Board.

(15) Central Valley Regional Water Quality Control Board.

(b) “Yolo Bypass Cache Slough Partnership Multibenefit Program” means the program established pursuant to Section 8512.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   (SB 369)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8512.

The Yolo Bypass Cache Slough Partnership Multibenefit Program is hereby established to support the development and implementation of projects within the Yolo Bypass and Cache Slough region. The participating state agencies enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 8511 shall work in collaboration with the participating federal and local agencies enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 8511 and the City of West Sacramento, if it chooses to participate,
 to advance all of the following objectives:

(a) Prioritize projects that
 accommodate multiple objectives in the Yolo Bypass and Cache Slough region.

(b) Identify project implementation challenges and work collaboratively to resolve those challenges.

(c) Develop programmatic and expedited approaches for regulatory compliance.

(d) Identify funding mechanisms for project implementation and long-term operations and maintenance.

(e) Develop strategies to foster regional agricultural sustainability, recreational opportunities, and long-term water supply reliability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   (SB 369)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. THE CENTRAL VALLEY FLOOD PROTECTION BOARD [8520. - 9142.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions and General Provisions [8520. - 8539.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [8520. - 8523.]

8520.

Unless the context otherwise requires the definitions hereinafter set forth shall govern the construction of this part of this division of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8521.

“Board” means the Central Valley Flood Protection Board. Any reference to the Reclamation Board in this or any other code means the Central Valley Flood Protection Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8522.

“Drainage district” means the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8522.3.

“Facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control” has the same meaning as that set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 5096.805 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366) by Stats. 2009, Ch. 275, Sec. 4.   (AB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8522.5.

“Project levee” has the same meaning as that set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 5096.805 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366) by Stats. 2009, Ch. 275, Sec. 6.   (AB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8523.

“State Plan of Flood Control” has the same meaning as that set forth in subdivision (j) of Section 5096.805 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366) by Stats. 2009, Ch. 275, Sec. 8.   (AB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [8525. - 8539.]

8525.

The report of the California Debris Commission transmitted to the Speaker of the House of Representatives of the United States by the Secretary of War on June 27, 1911, as modified by the report of the California Debris Commission, dated January 5, 1925, and as heretofore amended or modified by the board, is approved as a plan for controlling the flood water of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers and their tributaries, for the improvement and preservation of navigation and the reclamation and protection of lands that are susceptible to overflow from the rivers and their tributaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8526.

The board in conjunction with the California Debris Commission shall execute the plan approved by this chapter, and the board may make such modifications and amendments to the plan as are necessary to execute the plan for the purpose stated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8527.

For the purpose of cooperating in the carrying out and completion of the plan approved in Section 8525, and on condition that the United States will likewise cooperate in the carrying out of the plan and, to that end, will appropriate and make available to the extent that it has not already done so, substantially the same amount as the State as recommended in the plan, appropriations will be made by the State from time to time by law, which, together with amounts heretofore appropriated by the State in aid of the plan, will not exceed in the aggregate seventeen million seven hundred thousand dollars ($17,700,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8528.

The intent of the next preceding section is to provide for substantially equal contributions by the United States, the State and local interests to the total cost of carrying out the plan, it being recognized that certain local interests have become obligated in excess of one-third of the total cost of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8529.

All money appropriated under authority of Section 8527 shall be expended in accordance with the plans, specifications and recommendations of the California Debris Commission and the board for purposes in general conformity with the plan approved in Section 8525, including expenditures and appropriations to make such equitable adjustments as the Legislature may determine with such local interests as have obligated themselves in excess of their shares of one-third of the total cost of the plan, and including necessary expenditures for operation and maintenance during construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8530.

The board shall have control and jurisdiction over the plans of the California Debris Commission and such other plans as may be adopted by the board, excepting such portions of the plans as relate to channel excavating, enlargement, rectification and control in the Sacramento River and the construction of weirs.

All work and control in the Sacramento River and the construction of weirs shall remain concurrently with the United States and the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8531.

The Statutes of California as existing on April 1, 1923, shall be observed and followed:

(a) In all plans, hearings, notices and proceedings relating to the maintenance, repair and operation of reclamation and flood control works existing on April 1, 1923.

(b) In the completion, maintenance and operation of any project adopted by the board prior to April 1, 1923.

(c) In the adoption and carrying to completion of any project of work contained or involved in the report of the California Debris Commission dated January 5, 1925.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8532.

The State has a primary interest in adequately protecting lands overflowed, or subject to overflow, in confining the waters of rivers, tributaries, by-passes and overflow channels and basins within their respective basins and boundaries within the district, and in preserving the welfare of the residents and holders of land therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8533.

The State has a primary and supreme interest in having erected, maintained and protected on the banks of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers, their tributaries, by-passes, overflow channels and basins, good and sufficient levees and embankments or other works of reclamation, adequately protecting the lands overflowed or subject to overflow, and confining the waters of the rivers, tributaries, by-passes, overflow channels, and basins within their respective channels and boundaries.

(History: Added by stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8534.

The board at all times shall enforce on behalf of the State the erection, maintenance and protection of such levees, embankments and channel rectification as will, in its judgment, best serve the interests of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8535.

Consistent with Section 3 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution, the board, after holding at least one public hearing, may set and charge fees sufficient to cover the reasonable cost for the services it provides in carrying out its duties set forth in Sections 8502 and 8534, including, but not limited to, the issuance of and modifications to encroachment permits, inspections and enforcement of encroachments, and management and control of Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 95.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8536.

The board has no power, jurisdiction, authority or control over the construction, operation or maintenance of the Central Valley Project or any part of it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8538.

No county or public officer shall charge or receive any fee for any of the services required to be performed by him under the provisions of this part, but any reasonable and necessary expense actually incurred by any officer in carrying out any of the provisions of this part relating in any manner to the collection or enforcement of any assessment, shall be paid out of the funds of the drainage district applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8539.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is an urgent need for channel clearing and desnagging in many California waterways, and that these snags pose a severe danger and cause unnecessary erosion of banks.

The board, other state agencies, cities, counties, and districts are hereby authorized to cooperate with one another and with agencies of the United States in the performance of channel clearing and desnagging work within the Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers and their tributaries, and may furnish money, services, equipment, and other property to that end. The board, as appropriate, shall consult with the Department of Water Resources, the State Lands Commission, and the Department of Fish and Game in carrying out its responsibilities pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administrative Provisions [8550. - 8585.]



  ARTICLE 1. The Board [8550. - 8579.]

8550.

(a) The board is continued in existence and shall continue to exercise and have all of its powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall act independently of the department. The department shall not overturn any action or decision by the board.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer the duties and corresponding funding allocated to the Reclamation Board as it exists on December 31, 2007, together with all necessary positions, to the board as it is reconstituted on and after January 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8551.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (g), the board consists of nine members who shall be appointed in accordance with this section.

(b) (1) Seven members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(2) Of the members appointed pursuant to paragraph (1), the following requirements apply:

(A) One person shall be an engineer.

(B) One person shall have training, experience, and expertise in geology or hydrology.

(C) One person shall be a flood control expert with not less than five years’ experience.

(D) One person shall be an attorney with water experience.

(E) Three persons shall be public members.

(c) One member of the board shall be the Chair of the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water, to the extent that service with the board does not conflict with his or her legislative duties.

(d) One member of the board shall be the Chair of the Assembly Committee on Water, Parks and Wildlife, to the extent that service with the board does not conflict with his or her legislative duties.

(e) The members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) shall be nonvoting ex officio members.

(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the board members appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall serve four-year terms.

(2) The board members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall determine, by lot, that five members shall serve four-year terms and four members shall serve two-year terms.

(g) Each board member holding office on December 31, 2007, shall continue to serve until his or her successor is appointed and has been qualified to hold office. The order of replacement shall be determined by lot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.

Each member of the board appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8551 shall receive compensation as follows:

(a) Each member shall receive the necessary expenses incurred by the member in the performance of official duties.

(b) Any member traveling outside the state pursuant to authorization of the board, and the approval of the Governor and Director of Finance as provided by Section 11032 of the Government Code, while so engaged shall receive per diem and his or her necessary expenses.

(c) Each member shall receive the salary provided for in Section 11564 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8554.

The Governor shall select one of the members of the board as president.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8555.

The board may elect one of its members other than the president as vice president.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8556.

The vice president shall have the powers and perform the duties of the president under the following circumstances:

(a) During the president’s absence or inability to act.

(b) At the request of the president.

(c) When authorized by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8557.

The board shall have its office in the County of Sacramento. The office is the principal place of business and legal residence of the board and of the drainage district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 497, Sec. 4.   Effective September 14, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8558.

The regular meetings of the board shall be held at times fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8559.

A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 275, Sec. 9.   (AB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8560.

No action of the board shall be effective unless a quorum is present and the action is concurred in by a majority of all of the voting members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 275, Sec. 10.   (AB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8561.

Special meetings of the board may be called at any time by the president or by a majority of the members upon notice given by mail or telegraph to each member at his place of residence or business, and there received at least 12 hours before the hour fixed for the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8563.

The board shall keep full and correct minutes of all proceedings and transactions of all meetings of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8564.

The minutes shall be open for public inspection during office hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8565.

The board shall have a seal of such device as the board may adopt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8566.

The seal of the board is also the seal of the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8567.

A copy of any record of the board, certified by its secretary or assistant secretary to be a true copy, and attested by the seal of the board, is prima facie evidence of the existence and contents of the record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8568.

For making a copy of any of its records the board may charge and collect the actual reasonable cost of making the copy, including the time of its employees and materials used, and one dollar ($1) for the certificate if a certified copy is requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8569.

The board may require a deposit in advance sufficient to cover the charges for copying and certifying copies of its records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8570.

All money collected for copying and certifying copies of the board’s records shall be paid monthly to the State Treasurer and credited to the balance remaining unexpended of any appropriation or assessment available for the general administrative expenses of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8571.

The board may adopt, amend or repeal rules to promote the convenient, orderly and just conduct of the business of the board and of the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8572.

The rules may be suspended or compliance therewith may be waived by the board at any meeting to such extent as may be deemed proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8575.

A member of the board shall comply with the conflict of interest requirements of Section 87100 of the Government Code when voting to carry out any part of a plan of flood control and when carrying out the objects of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8576.

No member of the board shall be held personally liable on any obligation or liability of any kind or character arising out of the claim that he has failed to carry out any obligation imposed upon the board by this division and the Legislature expressly declares that discretion is vested in the board and the members thereof to determine how and when the various provisions of this division and the projects contemplated in this division with which the board is concerned may best be carried into effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8577.

(a) A board member shall not participate in any board action or attempt to influence any decision or recommendation by any employee of, or consultant to, the board that involves himself or herself or that involves any entity with which the member is connected as a director, officer, consultant, or full- or part-time employee, or in which the member has a direct personal financial interest within the meaning of Section 87100 of the Government Code.

(b) A board member shall not participate in any proceeding before any agency as a consultant or in any other capacity on behalf of any person that actively participates in matters before the board.

(c) For a period of 12 months after leaving office, a former board member shall not act as agent or attorney for, or otherwise represent, any other person before the board by making any formal or informal appearance or by making any oral or written communication to the board.

(d) A board member shall not advocate to the United States Army Corps of Engineers or other federal agency on behalf of any project that has been or is reasonably anticipated to be submitted to the board for review, unless the board authorizes that action in accordance with Section 8560.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8578.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “ex parte communication” means any oral or written communication outside of a noticed board meeting concerning matters, other than purely procedural matters, regarding any of the following: 

(1) An application that has been submitted to the board and has been determined to be complete by the executive officer.

(2) An enforcement action.

(3) Any other quasi-judicial matter requiring board action, after the matter has been placed on the board’s agenda and notice of the meeting has been provided pursuant to Section 11125 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) A board member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8551 shall not participate in an ex parte communication with any person or organization with an interest in board decisions, nor any person representing a person or organization with an interest in board decisions, excluding a staff member of the board acting in his or her official capacity, who intends to influence the decision of a board member on a matter before the board.

(2) If an ex parte communication occurs, the board member shall notify the interested party that a full disclosure of the ex parte communication shall be entered in the board’s record.

(3) Communications cease to be ex parte communications when the board member or the person who engaged in the communication with the board member fully discloses the
 communication and requests in writing that it be placed in the board’s official record of the proceeding.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 11425.10 of the Government Code, the ex parte communications provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Article 7 (commencing with Section 11430.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) do not apply to proceedings of the board to which this section applies.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366) by Stats. 2009, Ch. 275, Sec. 14.   (AB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8579.

(a) Any aggrieved person shall have a right to seek judicial review of any permit or enforcement order issued by the board by filing a petition for a writ of mandate in accordance with Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, within 30 days after the decision or action has become final.

(b) For purposes of this section, an “aggrieved person” means any person or public agency that, in person or through a representative, appeared at a public hearing of the board in connection with the decision or action appealed, or that, by other appropriate means before the decision, informed the board of the nature of their concerns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 1.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Employees [8580. - 8580.]

8580.

(a) The board may appoint an executive officer.

(b) The board may appoint a chief engineer.

(c) The board may employ legal counsel and other necessary staff.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration of Oaths [8585. - 8585.]

8585.

The president, any member of the board, the secretary, assistant secretary, general manager and chief engineer may administer oaths and take and certify affidavits relating to any matter pending before the board, or in which the board or the drainage district is interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Powers, Duties and Jurisdiction [8590. - 8723.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Powers [8590. - 8613.]

8590.

To carry out the primary state interest described in Section 8532, the board may do any of the following:

(a) Acquire either within or outside the boundaries of the drainage district, by purchase, condemnation or by other lawful means in the name of the drainage district, all lands, rights-of-way, easements, property or material necessary or requisite for the purpose of bypasses, weirs, cuts, canals, sumps, levees, overflow channels and basins, reservoirs and other flood control works, and other necessary purposes, including drainage purposes.

(b) Construct, clear, and maintain bypasses, levees, canals, sumps, overflow channels and basins, reservoirs and other flood control works.

(c) Construct, maintain, and operate ditches, canals, pumping plants, and other drainage works.

(d) Make contracts in the name of the drainage district to indemnify or compensate any owner of land or other property for any injury or damage caused by the exercise of the powers conferred by this division, or arising out of the use, taking, or damage of any property for any of the purposes of this division.

(e) Collaborate with state and federal agencies, if appropriate, regarding multiobjective flood management strategies that incorporate agricultural conservation, ecosystem protection and restoration, or recreational components.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8590.2.

In acquiring interests in land necessary for the purposes specified in Section 8590 and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 8676, the board in determining whether to acquire in fee or easement may consider such additional uses as fish and wildlife enhancement and recreation if so requested by another state agency. Any such parcel acquired in fee shall be subject to the continuing jurisdiction of the board to insure that the primary purposes of flood control are served and to prevent any damage or interference with the flood control works for any public nuisances arising out of such additional uses and any increased costs of maintenance attributable to such additional uses shall be borne by the agency requesting such uses.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the board to acquire any land over and above that necessary for the purposes specified in Section 8590.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1900.)
-------------------------------------------

8591.

The board has no power, authority, or jurisdiction, either directly or indirectly, except as provided in this division, to incur any indebtedness or expend any money or adopt or carry into effect any plan or project or to acquire any lands, rights of way, or easements, or to do any work, or cause any work to be performed, for which any land lying within the drainage district is to be assessed, except to maintain, repair, and operate its existing works of reclamation and flood control and to complete, maintain and operate any project adopted by the board prior to April 1, 1923, with the existing powers to levy assessments therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8592.

The board has the same power, authority and jurisdiction in reference to the adoption and carrying to completion of any work or project involved in or contained in the report of the California Debris Commission dated January 5, 1925, to the Congress of the United States as are conferred in the case of projects adopted by the board prior to April 1, 1923.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8593.

The board may acquire by eminent domain in the name of the drainage district any property necessary for any of the purposes set forth in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

8596.

The board may maintain actions in the name of the people of the State to restrain, or to recover damages for, the doing of any act or thing that may be injurious to any of the works necessary to the plan of flood control or that may interfere with the successful execution of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8597.

Any damages so recovered shall be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the drainage district and the assessment for the particular portion or project affected by the injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8598.

The board may also do any of the following:

(a) Establish a standard of levee construction.

(b) Do any and all things necessary or incident to the powers granted or to carry out the objects specified in this article.

(c) Maintain actions in the name of the people of the State to restrain the diversion of the water of any stream that will increase the flow of water in the Sacramento or San Joaquin Rivers or their tributaries, and such diversion of the water of any stream into the rivers or either of them or any of their tributaries, is a public nuisance which may be prevented or abated by the board.

(d) Rent, lease for oil, gas or other hydrocarbons in the manner provided for in this chapter, or dispose, by sale, exchange, in payment for work done or services rendered, or for any other purpose which the board may deem advisable, of any land, property, material, equipment, or any other thing in the possession of the drainage district, which, in the opinion of the board, is no longer needed for the purposes of flood control works or other necessary or convenient purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8598.5.

Notwithstanding Section 6402 of the Public Resources Code, the board may sell or lease surplus real property which is held in fee by the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District and which lies within a predominantly residential, industrial, or commercial area, without reserving the right to extract minerals or petroleum products through the surface of such property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

8599.

The board may undertake any construction work that it is authorized to do by this part, free from any control or jurisdiction of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8600.

Subject to the provisions of the State Contract Act any construction work undertaken by the board may be done wholly or partly by contract let by the board in such manner as the board may determine, or may be done wholly or partly by day labor or force account if deemed advisable by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8600.5.

(a) The governing body of a public entity that is authorized by law to construct, manage, maintain, or repair levees, channels, or other flood control works that are under the jurisdiction of the board may adopt standards for the operation and maintenance of those flood control works that are more protective of public safety than the standards adopted by the board pursuant to Section 8608, including, but not limited to, standards that are more restrictive of encroachments on levees and adjacent areas.

(b) The standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be effective upon approval by the board.

(c) The public entity shall apply the standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) prospectively.

(d) The governing body of the public entity may revise the standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) subject to the approval of the board. The board may unilaterally revise these standards upon 90 days’ written notice to the public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

8601.

The board may construct, purchase, rent, sell or exchange dredgers, machines, appliances, tools, apparatus and other property necessary or convenient for doing any construction work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8602.

The cost of the equipment and property shall be apportioned to and paid from the funds raised from the several assessments levied or to be levied by the board in a just and equitable manner according to the use made of the equipment or property in carrying out the several separate portions or projects for which the assessments are levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8603.

The board may rent for use by others idle dredgers or other equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8604.

The rental received shall be paid to the State Treasurer and credited to the balance remaining unexpended of the assessments against which the cost of such equipment has been paid or is to be charged as indicated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8605.

The board may inspect and supervise any work done or under construction pursuant to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8606.

The board may insert a stipulation providing for such inspection and supervision in any order, contract or other instrument, relating to the work authorized in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8608.

The board shall establish and enforce standards for the maintenance and operation of levees, channels, and other flood control works of an authorized project or an adopted plan, including but not limited to standards for encroachment, construction, vegetation and erosion control measures. In adopting such standards, the board shall give full consideration to fish and wildlife, recreation and environmental factors. Any violation of such adopted standards without the permission of the board is a public nuisance, and the board may commence and maintain suit in the name of the people of the state for the prevention or abatement of the nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

8609.

(a) The board may designate floodways throughout the Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers drainage to control encroachments in, and to preserve the flow regimens of, floodways for the purpose of protecting public improvements, lives, land use values, and improvements created in reliance upon historical flooding patterns.

(b) As used in this part, “Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers drainage,” or equivalent language, means all lands currently and historically drained by the Sacramento River and the San Joaquin River and their tributaries and distributaries.

(c) This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 177.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.
